nb: Baby og barn > Amming og mating > Mat for baby og barn: Frokostblandinger for baby; Babydrikker; Babymat; Morsmelkerstatning; Babysnacks; Ernæringsdrikker og -shakes for barn
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Θηλασμός & σίτιση > Βρεφική & παιδική τροφή: Βρεφικά δημητριακά; Βρεφικά ροφήματα; Βρεφικές τροφές; Βρεφικό γάλα; Βρεφικά σνακ; Παιδικά ροφήματα διατροφής
pt-BR: Infantil > Amamentação e alimentação > Comida para bebês: Cereais para bebê; Sucos para bebês; Alimentação infantil; Fórmula para bebês; Lanches para bebês; Milk-shakes e bebidas nutritivas para crianças
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Szoptatás és etetés > Baba- és csecsemőétel: Babaműzlik; Babaitalok; Babaétel; Babatápszer; Baba snackek; Csecsemő táplálkozási italok és turmixok
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 哺乳与喂养 > 婴幼儿食品: 婴儿谷物食品; 婴儿饮料; 婴儿食品; 婴儿配方奶粉; 婴儿零食; 幼儿营养饮料/奶昔/沙冰
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Imetys ja syöttäminen > Vauvan ja leikki-ikäisen ruoka: Vauvan puurot; Vauvan juomat; Vauvan ruoka; Maidonkorvike; Vauvan välipalat; Leikki-ikäisten ravinnejuomat ja -pirtelöt
nl: Baby en peuter > Borstvoeding en voeding > Voeding voor baby's en peuters: Ontbijtgranen voor baby's; Dranken voor baby's; Babyvoeding; Melkpoeder voor baby's; Babysnacks; Voedzame drankjes en shakes voor peuters
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 哺育和餵食 > 嬰幼兒食品: 嬰兒麥片; 嬰兒飲品; 嬰兒食品; 配方奶粉; 嬰兒零嘴; 嬰幼兒飲品
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Lactancia y alimentación > Comida para bebés y niños: Cereales para bebés; Bebidas para bebés; Comida para bebés; Fórmula infantil; Aperitivos para bebés; Bebidas y batidos nutritivos para niños pequeños
ko: 영유아 > 수유/이유식 용품 > 영유아식: 아기 시리얼; 아기 음료수; 이유식; 유아 분유; 아기 간식; 유아용 영양 음료/셰이크
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Dojenje i hranjenje > Hrana za bebe i malu djecu: Dječje žitarice; Napitci za bebe; Hrana za bebe; Adaptirano mlijeko za dojenčad; Grickalice za bebe; Prehrambeni napici i shakeovi za malu djecu
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Emzirme ve Beslenme > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Gıdaları: Bebek Tahılları; Bebek İçecekleri; Bebek Gıdaları; Bebek Devam Sütleri; Bebek Atıştırmalıkları; Bebek Ek Gıdaları
sv: Baby och småbarn > Amning och matning > Mat för baby och småbarn: Babyflingor; Babydrycker; Babymat; Bröstmjölksersättning; Mellanmål för barn; Näringsdrycker och näringsshakes för småbarn
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Alăptare și hrănire > Alimente pentru bebeluși și copii mici: Cereale pentru copii; Băuturi pentru copii; Mâncare pentru copii; Lapte praf pentru bebeluși; Gustări pentru copii; Băuturi și shake-uri nutritive pentru copii mici
sk-SK: Bábätká > Dojčenie a kŕmenie > Dojčenské príkrmy: Detské cereálie; Detské nápoje; Detská výživa; Dojčenské mlieko; Detské maškrty; Nutrične vyvážené nápoje a kokteily pre batoľatá
cs: Děti a kojenci > Kojení a krmení > Dětská a kojenecká strava: Dětské cereálie; Dětské džusy; Kojenecká výživa; Kojenecká mléka; Svačinky pro děti; Dětské nutriční nápoje a koktejly
en: Baby & Toddler > Nursing & Feeding > Baby & Toddler Food: Baby Cereals; Baby Drinks; Baby Food; Baby Formula; Baby Snacks; Toddler Nutrition Drinks & Shakes
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Karmienie > Jedzenie dla dzieci i niemowląt: Płatki dla niemowląt; Soczki dla niemowląt; Jedzenie dla niemowląt; Mleko w proszku dla niemowląt; Przekąski dla niemowląt; Napoje i szejki dla niemowląt
it: Bebè e bimbi > Allattamento e alimentazione > Alimenti per bebè e bambini: Cereali per bambini; Bevande per bambini; Alimenti per bebè; Alimenti per bambini; Snack per bebè; Bevande e frullati nutritivi per bebè
ja: ベビー用品 > 授乳・離乳食 > ベビーフード・離乳食: ベビー用シリアル; ベビー用ジュース; ベビーフード; 粉ミルク; ベビー用スナック; 幼児用栄養ドリンク・シェイク
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Žindymas ir maitinimas > Maistas kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams: Grūdų produktai kūdikiams; Gėrimai kūdikiams; Maistas kūdikiams; Mišinukai kūdikiams; Užkandžiai kūdikiams; Gėrimai ir kokteiliai mažiems vaikams
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Amamentação e alimentação > Comida para bebé e criança: Cereais para bebé; Bebidas para bebé; Comida para bebé; Fórmulas para bebé; Snacks para bebé; Batidos e bebidas de nutrição para criança
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Dojenje in hranjenje > Hrana za dojenčke in malčke: Otroška žita; Otroški napitki; Otroška hrana; Adaptirano mleko;; Otroški prigrizki; Prehranski napitki in šejki za malčke
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Allaitement et alimentation > Nourriture pour bébés et tout-petits: Céréales pour bébés; Boissons pour bébés; Aliments pour bébés; Lait en poudre pour bébés; Snacks pour bébés; Boissons pour bébés et tout-petits
da: Baby og småbørn > Amning og madning > Baby og småbørn – mad: Baby – morgenmadsprodukter; Drikkevarer til babyer; Baby – mad; Baby – modermælkserstatning; Baby – snacks; Proteindrikke til småbørn
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Stillen & Füttern > Nahrung für Babys & Kleinkinder: Baby-Müsli; Babysäfte; Babynahrung; Milchnahrung; Baby-Snacks; Getränke und Milchmischgetränke
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การให้นม > อาหารทารกและเด็กเล็ก: ซีเรียลสำหรับทารก; เครื่องดื่มสำหรับทารก; อาหารทารก; อาหารนมสำหรับทารก; อาหารว่างสำหรับทารก; เครื่องดื่มบำรุงสำหรับเด็กเล็ก
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Кърмене и хранене > Храна за бебета и малки деца: Бебешки зърнени храни; Бебешки напитки; Бебешка храна; Адаптирани млека; Бебешки междинни закуски; Хранителни напитки и шейкове за малки деца
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Cho con bú và cho ăn > Đồ ăn cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ: Ngũ cốc cho trẻ sơ sinh; Đồ uống cho trẻ sơ sinh; Đồ ăn cho trẻ sơ sinh; Sữa công thức cho trẻ sơ sinh; Đồ ăn vặt cho trẻ sơ sinh; Thức uống dinh dưỡng của trẻ tập đi
ru: Товары для детей > Питание и кормление > Продукты питания для детей и младенцев: Детские каши; Детские напитки; Детское питание; Детские смеси; Детские снеки; Напитки и коктейли для маленьких детей